Maryland, session 2026, HB0804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 15 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Human Services
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the Department of Aging.
(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Aging.
10–204.
(a) The Secretary shall administer the programs and activities that the federal
government delegates to the State under the Older Americans Act of 1965 that are not
otherwise committed by law to another unit of State government.
(b) The Secretary:
(1) is a member of the Governor’s Executive Council; and
(2) shall cooperate with and receive the cooperation of State, federal, and
local governmental units to carry out the purposes of this title.
(c) The Secretary shall:
(1) evaluate the service needs of seniors in the State;
(2) determine the extent to which existing public and private programs
meet the needs of seniors;
(3) establish priorities for meeting the needs of seniors;
(4) coordinate, subject to existing law, assess and evaluate, and educate
the public and professionals about all State and local programs and services, both public
and private, that relate and are important to the well–being of seniors in the State,
including programs and services in the areas of:
(i) income maintenance;
(ii) public health;
(iii) mental health;
(iv) housing and urban development;
(v) employment;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 15
(vi) education;
(vii) recreation; and
(viii) rehabilitation of seniors with physical or mental disabilities; and
(5) develop a statewide plan incorporating local plans for a comprehensive
and coordinated system of health, social, and community services for seniors, including
housing and institutional and noninstitutional care.
(d) The Secretary shall:
(1) represent the interests of seniors by serving as an advocate at all levels
of government;
(2) consult with and advise the secretaries of the principal departments of
State government about the programs and services for seniors that are the primary
responsibility of those departments;
(3) consult with the Commission on Aging on all matters pertaining to
programs for seniors;
(4) provide consultation and technical assistance to communities and civic
groups developing local services for seniors;
(5) maintain a clearinghouse of information related to the interests of
seniors; and
(6) review and recommend policies to the Governor on publicly funded
plans and programs that affect seniors.
(e) The Secretary may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of law that
are within the jurisdiction of the Secretary.
(F) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE AGING RESILIENCE
FUND.
(2) THERE IS AN AGING RESILIENCE FUND.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S MISSION UNDER THIS TITLE.
(4) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
– 3 –

Ch. 15 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(6) (I) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) 1. INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND;
(II) 2. ANY FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(III) 3. ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE
ACCEPTED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(II) MONEY RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT FROM THE FUND
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED
TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED IN
THE ANNUAL STATE OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET BILL FOR PROJECTS OR
ACTIVITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(7) THE FUND MAY BE USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES THAT
ALIGN WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S MISSION UNDER THIS TITLE, INCLUDING:
(I) PERSONNEL;
(II) (I) PARTNERSHIP DEVELOPMENT; AND
(III) (II) ANY PROGRAMS, SERVICES, OR ACTIVITIES WITHIN
THE DEPARTMENT.
(8) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(9) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(10) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 7–213 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE GOVERNOR MAY NOT REDUCE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 15
AN APPROPRIATION FOR THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET AS APPROVED BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION, MONEY
APPROPRIATED FOR THE FUND SHALL REMAIN IN THE FUND.
(11) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE SECRETARY SHALL
REPORT TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH
COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE FUND FOR THE PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE TOTAL AMOUNT IN THE FUND;
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF DEPOSITS MADE TO THE FUND,
INCLUDING AMOUNTS AND SOURCES; AND
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF EXPENDITURES MADE FROM THE
FUND, INCLUDING AMOUNTS AND PURPOSES.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE AGING RESILIENCE FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 5 –

Ch. 15 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 6 –